Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-1127
Special education; school board; duties.

The school board of every school district shall provide or contract for special education programs and transportation for all resident children with disabilities who would benefit from such programs in accordance with the Special Education Act and all applicable requirements of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., as such sections existed on January 1, 2019, and the regulations adopted thereunder.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 1093, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-641;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3320;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 809;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 40;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 23.

Option students, how treated, see section 79-235.